Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; STUDENT LOAN DEBT COUNSELING.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for student loan debt counseling under Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.1788. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education may use no more than three percent of the appropriation to administer the student loan debt counseling program. new text end